Utah statutes.
26-40-106.   Program benefits.
(1)  Until the department implements a plan under Subsection (2), program
benefits may include:
(a)  hospital services;
(b)  physician services;
(c)  laboratory services;
(d)  prescription drugs;
(e)  mental health services;
(f)  basic dental services;
(g)  preventive care including:
(i)  routine physical examinations;
(ii)  immunizations;
(iii)  basic vision services; and
(iv)  basic hearing services;
(h)  limited home health and durable medical equipment services; and
(i)  hospice care.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), no later than July 1, 2008,
the program benefits shall be benchmarked, in accordance with 42 U.S.C.
1397cc, to be actuarially equivalent to a benefit plan with the largest
insured commercial enrollment offered by a health maintenance organization in
the state.
(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(c), after July 1, 2008:
(i)  program benefits may not exceed the benefit level described in Subsection
(2)(a); and
(ii)  program benefits shall be adjusted every July 1, thereafter to meet the
benefit level described in Subsection (2)(a).
(c)  The program benefits for enrollees who are at or below 100% of the
federal poverty level are exempt from the benchmark requirements of
Subsections (2)(a) and (2)(b).
